Maryland, session 2026, HB0306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
15–207.
(h) (1) (i) Any consumer rebates, dealer incentives, price or interest rate
reductions, or finance terms that a manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch offers or
advertises, or allows its dealers to offer or advertise, shall be offered to all dealers of the
same line make.
(ii) Any manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch that denies the
benefit of any consumer rebates, dealer incentives, price or interest rate reductions, or
finance terms to a dealer on the basis that the dealer failed to comply with performance
standards has the burden of proving that the performance standards comply with the
provisions of this section.
(2) Unless a dealer violates a State or local law intended to protect the
public, a manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch may not:
– 1 –

Ch. 770 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Require a dealer to alter or replace an existing dealership
facility; or
(ii) Deny, or threaten to deny, any benefit generally available to all
dealers for a dealer’s failure to alter or replace an existing dealership facility.
(3) UNLESS A DEALER VIOLATES § 15–313(A) OR (B) OF THIS TITLE
OR A STATE OR LOCAL LAW INTENDED TO PROTECT THE PUBLIC, A MANUFACTURER,
DISTRIBUTOR, OR FACTORY BRANCH MAY NOT TAKE AN ADVERSE ACTION AGAINST
A DEALER FOR DISCLOSING ON ITS WEBSITE THAT THE ADVERTISED PRICE OF A
VEHICLE IS THE MANUFACTURER’S MINIMUM ALLOWABLE ADVERTISED PRICE AND
THAT THE DEALER MAY OFFER A LOWER PRICE FOR THE VEHICLE.
[(3)] (4) A manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch may not reduce
the price of a motor vehicle charged to a dealer or provide different financing terms to a
dealer in exchange for the dealer’s agreement to:
(i) Maintain an exclusive sales or service facility;
(ii) Build or alter a sales or service facility; or
(iii) Participate in a floor plan or other financing arrangement.
15–313.
(a) A dealer or an agent or employee of a dealer may not use any advertisement
that is in any way false, deceptive, or misleading.
(b) A dealer or an agent or employee of a dealer may not by any means advertise
or offer to the public any vehicle without intent to sell it as advertised or offered.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –